Maine, session 132, LD1505.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1811, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Phase-out of sales tax; publication and update of rates. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2026, and every 2 years thereafter,
each rate of tax imposed pursuant to subsection 1 for each category of tangible personal
property, products transferred electronically and taxable service is decreased by 1/2
percentage point until the rate of tax imposed for that category of tangible personal
property, products transferred electronically or taxable service is 0%. The assessor,
beginning December 1, 2025, and every 2 years thereafter, shall publish on the bureau's
publicly accessible website the rate of tax to be imposed on each category of tangible
personal property, products transferred electronically and taxable service taxed pursuant to
subsection 1 that is in effect the January 1st following the publication. The assessor,
concurrent with that publication, shall submit a bill to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over taxation matters indicating the reduced rates pursuant
to this subsection and any other changes necessitated by the reduction or elimination of the
tax imposed pursuant to this section. The joint standing committee shall report out a bill
making the necessary statutory changes.